Massachusetts, session 194th, H3021.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subparagraph (e) of section 6 of chapter 64H of the General Laws is hereby amended by
inserting the following phrase in line 22 after the words “five hundred and one (c)(3)”:— “or five
hundred and one (c)(19)”.
of 1